Utah statutes.
19-6-322.   Cooperative agreements with federal government -- Legislative findings.

Due to the enactment of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, PL 96-510, and recognizing the applicability of that act to the unauthorized or accidental discharge of hazardous substances or to inactive hazardous waste sites in the state of Utah, the Legislature finds and declares it to be in the public interest to enter into agreements with the federal Environmental Protection Agency to undertake activities and perform remedial and removal actions as provided by PL 96-510, to protect the public health, safety, and welfare.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

